North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-15 Cooperative Associations
10-15-28.
Action without meeting by directors or members.

Any action which may be taken at a member meeting may be taken without a meeting if a writing setting forth and approving the action taken shall be signed by a majority of the members entitled to vote on such action. Any action which may be taken at a meeting of the directors or executive committee may be taken without a meeting if a writing setting forth and approving the action taken shall be signed by all of the directors or executive committee members entitled to vote on such action. In such cases, such consent shall have the same force and effect as if a meeting had been held.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1528.

10-15-29.
Officers.

The principal officers of a cooperative are a president, one or more vice presidents and a treasurer as prescribed in the bylaws, and a secretary. They shall be elected annually by the board at such time and in such manner as the bylaws provide. Each principal officer except the secretary and the treasurer must be a director of the cooperative. The offices of secretary and treasurer may be combined in one person. If the bylaws provide, the board of directors may also elect from its number a chairman and one or more vice chairmen, in which case the president and vice presidents need not be directors or stockholders.

Any other officer may be chosen by the board or as provided in the bylaws.

All officers shall have such authority and perform such duties as the bylaws provide or as the board may determine not inconsistent with the bylaws. Any officer may be removed by the board whenever in its judgment the best interests of the cooperative will be served thereby. Election or appointment shall not of itself create contract rights.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1529; S.L. 1983, ch. 133, § 1; 2005, ch. 99, § 3.

10-15-30.
Compensation and benefits to directors, officers, and employees.

Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, only the members may establish compensation or other benefits for a director, not available generally to officers and employees, for services as a director.

Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, for prior or future services of any officer or employee, the board may provide reasonable compensation, pension, bonuses, or other benefits to such officer or employee, and pension or other benefits to family members or beneficiaries of an officer or employee. No officer or employee who is a director may take part in the vote on that person’s salary for services rendered the cooperative.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1530.

10-15-31.
Liability of directors and members.

Directors, trustees, and officers, and the manager who is the person most responsible for carrying out the policies and directives of the trustees, officers, or board of directors, are immune from civil liability for any act or omission relating to their service or function as a director, trustee, officer, or manager, unless the act or omission constitutes gross or willful negligence or gross or willful misconduct.

Members, stockholders, and patrons of a cooperative are neither obligated to pay, nor liable upon, any cooperative obligation.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1531; S.L. 1987, ch. 137, § 3.

10-15-32.
Disposition of assets — Right to secure debts.

Except as authorized by the members, the board may not dispose of all or substantially all of a cooperative’s fixed assets. At any meeting the members may authorize the disposition of all or substantially all of a cooperative’s fixed assets if:

Notice that such disposition will be considered at such meeting has been given to all persons entitled to vote thereon.

Such disposition has been approved by three-fourths of those voting at the meeting.

Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, the board may secure payment of a cooperative’s debts by mortgaging the cooperative’s rights, privileges, authority and franchises, revenues, and other property.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1532.

10-15-33.
Apportionment and distribution of proceeds.

At least once annually the directors shall determine and distribute net proceeds as follows:

There shall be deducted from total proceeds:

All operating expenses and costs.

The cost of supplies, commodities, equipment, and other property or services procured or sold for patrons.

The cost of services performed for patrons.

All taxes and all other expenses.

Reasonable and necessary reserves for depreciation, depletion, and obsolescence of physical property, doubtful accounts, and other valuation reserves, all of which shall be established in accordance with usual and customary accounting practices.

The remainder of the total proceeds are net proceeds and shall be distributed and paid as follows:

An amount, not to exceed five percent thereof, may be set aside as an educational fund to be used in teaching or promoting cooperative organization or principles when approved by a majority of the members voting at any annual meeting. Such fund shall for all purposes except the computation of net proceeds be deemed an expense of operation of the cooperative. Such funds shall not be used in any political activity. Such educational funds shall not be paid to any other cooperative, mutual aid corporation, or other general farm organization unless such cooperative, mutual aid corporation, or general farm organization receiving such funds provides in its bylaws or articles that officers and directors shall be elected by secret ballot and that only active or retired farmers and ranchers, their spouses, and their children, are eligible to vote on the affairs of the cooperative, mutual aid corporation, or general farm organization.

A share of the net proceeds may be set aside for or paid to employees. Such amount shall for all purposes except the computation of net proceeds be deemed an expense of operation of the cooperative.

In a cooperative organized with capital stock, such dividend may be paid upon capital stock as is authorized by the articles. No dividend may be paid if the capital is impaired or if payment of such dividend would result in an impairment of capital.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise expressly provide, none of the remainder of the net proceeds shall constitute income of the cooperative but all thereof shall be distributed and paid to patrons, whether members or not, as follows:

Reasonable reserves for necessary purposes may be created, which shall be credited to patrons in accordance with the ratio which their patronage bears to total patronage.

All the remainder of the net proceeds shall be distributed and paid to patrons in accordance with the ratio which their patronage bears to total patronage.

There shall be no distinction between the persons entitled thereto, but such reserves and distribution may be based upon business done with particular departments or in particular commodities, supplies, or services, or upon classification of business according to the type or nature thereof.

If the articles or bylaws so provide:

Any of the net proceeds may be credited to allocated or unallocated surplus or reserves of the cooperative.

None of the remainder shall constitute income to the cooperative, but all thereof shall be distributed and paid in accordance with the ratio which individual patronage bears to total patronage, either to all patrons, to member patrons only, or to all patrons with nonmembers receiving a lower proportion than members, as the bylaws may provide. There shall be no other distinction between members and nonmembers, but distribution may be based on business done with particular departments, or in particular commodities, supplies, or services, or upon classification of business according to type or nature thereof.

The distribution and payment of net proceeds under subsections 3 and 4 may be in cash, credits, stock, membership interests, certificates of interest, revolving fund certificates, letters of advice, or other certificates or securities of the cooperative or of other associations, corporations, or limited liability companies, in other property, or in any combination thereof.

All or any part of the net proceeds may be applied to losses incurred in prior years, and the bylaws may also include any reasonable provisions for the apportionment of losses.

When authorized by a majority of the members voting at any annual meeting, the directors may provide for the deduction from patronage dividends of membership dues in any other cooperative, mutual aid corporation, or other general farm organization.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1533; S.L. 1959, ch. 114, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

10-15-34.
Unclaimed distributions, redemptions, or payments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1977, ch. 75, § 4.

Note.

See N.D.C.C. § 10-15-34.1 for present provisions on unclaimed distributions, redemptions, or payments.

10-15-34.1.
Unclaimed distributions, redemptions, or payments.

Any distribution of proceeds or redemption of, or payment based upon, any security by a domestic cooperative, excluding all credit unions, which remains unclaimed six years after the date authorized for retirement or payment in cash or other property, may be forfeited by the board. Any amount forfeited shall revert to the domestic cooperative, as contributed capital, if, at least six months prior to the declared date of forfeiture, notice that such payment is available has been mailed to the last-known address of the person shown by the records to be entitled thereto, or if the address is unknown, notice is published under section 10-15-23.

This section applies to all such payments authorized before or after July 1, 1979.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 152, § 1.

Cross-References.

Abandoned and unclaimed property, see N.D.C.C. ch. 47-30.1.

10-15-35.
Books and records — Penalty for refusal to produce.

A cooperative shall keep correct and complete books and records of account and shall also keep minutes of the proceedings of meetings of its members, board, and executive committee. The cooperative shall keep at its principal office records of the names and addresses of all members and stockholders with the amount of stock held by each and of ownership of equity interests. At any reasonable time, any member or stockholder, or the agent or attorney of either, upon written notice delivered or sent to the cooperative at least one week in advance, may examine any books or records for a purpose that is proper and specified in the notice.

In any proceedings, or upon petition, any court of record may, upon notice and after hearing at which proper cause is shown, and upon suitable terms, order any of the cooperative’s books or records, and any other pertinent documents in its possession, or duly authenticated copies thereof, to be brought within this state. The documents must be kept at the place and for the time and purposes the order designates. Any cooperative failing to comply with the order is subject to dissolution, and its directors and officers are guilty of contempt of court.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1535; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 70; 1993, ch. 89, § 1.

10-15-36.
Annual reports — Filing thereof — Fees — Penalties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1536; S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 7; 1983, ch. 134, § 1; 1993, ch. 75, § 5; 1993, ch. 88, § 3; 1997, ch. 102, § 6; 2005, ch. 99, § 4; 2009, ch. 106, § 3; repealed by 2015, ch. 86, § 24, effective July 1, 2015.

10-15-37.
Amendments to articles.

At any member meeting, a cooperative may adopt any amendment to its articles which is lawful under section 10-15-05 if a statement of the nature of the amendment was contained in the notice of the meeting.

An amendment is adopted when approved by members holding a majority of the member votes cast thereon.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1537.

10-15-38.
Filing amendments — Limitation of action.

Amendments to articles must be signed and acknowledged by an officer of the cooperative and set forth:

The name of the cooperative.

The amendments and date of adoption.

The number of members.

The number of members voting for and against the amendment.

One copy of the amendment must be retained in the records of the association, and one copy must be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

No amendment may affect any existing claim for relief or proceedings to which the cooperative is a party or existing rights of persons other than members or stockholders.

No action may be maintained to invalidate any amendment because of the manner of its adoption unless commenced within two years after the date of filing.

A cooperative that amends its name and is the owner of a service mark, trademark, or trade name, is a general partner named in a fictitious name certificate, or is a general partner in a limited partnership which is on file with the secretary of state, must change or amend its name in each registration when it files an amendment.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1538; S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 8; 1985, ch. 82, § 11; 1991, ch. 98, § 2; 1993, ch. 88, § 4; 2009, ch. 106, § 4.

10-15-39.
Restated articles.

A cooperative may, by action taken in the manner required for an amendment, adopt restated articles which shall state they supersede existing articles and amendments. Restated articles shall meet all requirements of original articles except:

Incorporators constituting the temporary board and the names and addresses of the incorporators may be omitted.

The location of the principal office, or the complete address of the present registered agent, shall be set forth as of the time of adoption of the restated articles. The name of a new registered agent as provided in chapter 10-01.1 and, if a noncommercial registered agent, then the address of such noncommercial registered agent in this state may be set forth in lieu of the location of the principal office.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1539; S.L. 2007, ch. 99, § 7.

10-15-40.
Amendments by bankruptcy court.

Certified copies of any order of a court of the United States, in proceedings under the bankruptcy laws, shall be filed as an amendment if the order affects an amendment to the articles. The principal officers of a cooperative shall cause each order to be promptly filed after it becomes final.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1540; S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 9.

10-15-41.
Merger and consolidation.

If otherwise lawful, any two or more associations may merge or consolidate under this chapter or under the law of the state where the surviving or new association will exist. Before a cooperative may merge or consolidate with any other association, a written plan of merger or consolidation shall be prepared by the board or by a committee selected by the board or the members for that purpose. Such plan shall set forth all the terms of the merger or consolidation and the proposed effect thereof on all members and stockholders of the cooperative. In case of consolidation, the plan shall also contain the articles of the new association. The members shall approve the plan in the manner provided in section 10-15-37 for amendments to the articles.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1541.

Law Reviews.

Cooperative Mergers and Consolidations: A Consideration of the Legal and Tax Issues, 63 N.D. L. Rev. 377 (1987).

10-15-42.
Articles of merger or consolidation — Effect.

Articles of merger or consolidation shall set forth the approved plan and such other information as is required by section 10-15-38. They shall be signed by two principal officers of each association merging or consolidating, sealed with the seal of each such association if any, and filed as an amendment to the articles. Unless otherwise specified in the plan, the merger or consolidation is effective when the articles are so filed.

After the effective date, the associations which are parties to the plan become a single association. In the case of a merger, the surviving association is that association so designated in the plan. In the case of a consolidation, the new association is the association provided for in the plan. The separate existence of all associations which are parties to the plan, except the surviving or new association, then ceases.

The surviving or new association possesses all the rights and all the property of each of the individual associations and is responsible for all their obligations. Title to any property is vested in the surviving or new association with no reversion or impairment thereof caused by the merger or consolidation. No right of any creditor may be impaired by the merger or consolidation without the creditor’s consent.

The articles of the surviving association are deemed amended to the extent provided in the plan of merger.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1542; S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 10; 2021, ch. 85, § 9, effective August 1, 2021.

10-15-43.
Division of a cooperative.

Any cooperative may divide itself into two or more cooperatives under this chapter. A written plan of division shall be prepared by the board or by a committee selected by the board for that purpose. Such plan shall set forth all the terms of the division and the proposed effect thereof on all members and stockholders of the cooperative. The plan shall also contain the articles of each new cooperative being formed and any amendments to the articles of the remaining cooperative.

The members shall approve the plan in the manner provided in section 10-15-37 for amendments to articles.

Articles of division shall set forth the approved plan and such other information as is required by section 10-15-38 and shall be filed as an amendment to the articles. Each part of the plan which contains the articles of a new cooperative shall be separately filed as articles of association for such new cooperative.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1543; S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 11.

10-15-44.
Conversion of corporation.

A corporation may convert itself into a cooperative by adopting an amendment to its articles by which it elects to become subject to this chapter, together with changes in its articles required by this chapter and other desirable changes permitted by this chapter. Such amendment shall be adopted and filed in the manner provided by the law then applicable to the corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1544; S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 12.

10-15-45.
Voluntary dissolution.

At any member meeting, whether or not a quorum is present, a cooperative may dissolve if:

Notice that a resolution for dissolution will be considered and acted upon has been given to all members and to all other persons entitled by the articles to vote thereon.

Such resolution is adopted by members holding three-fourths of the member votes cast thereon. The articles may permit stockholders to vote on the resolution for dissolution.

When the resolution is adopted, either a committee designated by the resolution or the board shall liquidate all assets and pay the net proceeds of such liquidation available for distribution to all persons entitled to the same by law, the articles, and the bylaws.

Articles of dissolution shall be signed by a majority of directors or of committee members and shall be sealed with the cooperative’s seal, if any. They shall set forth:

The name of the cooperative.

The name and address of each director or committee member.

The date of adoption of the resolution of dissolution.

A statement that all liquidation activities have been completed.

The articles of dissolution shall be filed as provided in section 10-15-53, and thereupon the existence of the cooperative ceases.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1545; S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 13.

10-15-46.
Involuntary dissolution.

A cooperative may be dissolved involuntarily by a decree of the district court where the principal office or registered agent is located in an action commenced by the attorney general when any of the following is established:

The cooperative’s certificate of association was procured through fraud.

The cooperative has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by this chapter.

The cooperative failed to comply with a court order for the production of books, records, or other documents of the cooperative as provided in section 10-15-35.

If the cooperative cures its defaults under subdivision c of subsection 1 prior to the entry of the court’s final decree and pays all penalties and court costs that have accrued, the claim for relief with respect to the defaults so cured will abate.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1546; S.L. 1985, ch. 82, § 12; 1993, ch. 88, § 5.

10-15-47.
Liquidation under court supervision.

The district court of the county where the principal office or registered agent of the cooperative is located may liquidate the assets and business of such cooperative when an action for that purpose is filed by or on behalf of:

A majority of the designated committee or directors when a resolution is adopted pursuant to section 10-15-45.

The attorney general when a decree of dissolution has been obtained pursuant to section 10-15-46.

A judgment creditor whose execution is returned unsatisfied when it is established that the cooperative is unable to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of its business.

Any creditor when it is established that the cooperative is dissolving pursuant to section 10-15-45 without making adequate provision for payment of all creditors.

Upon filing of any such action, the court acquires exclusive jurisdiction of all matter pertaining to the liquidation of such cooperative and the distribution of its assets to persons entitled thereto and may determine and order paid the expense of such liquidation proceeding. The court has power to issue injunctions, appoint receivers with such duties and powers as the court may direct, and take any other action necessary to the cooperative’s liquidation. A receiver appointed in such proceeding has authority to sue and be sued as receiver for the cooperative.

The court shall fix the time within which creditors may file claims and shall prescribe the notice to be given to interested persons. Creditors who do not file their claims within the time limit may not participate in any distribution thereafter made, unless the court upon good cause shown extends their time for filing.

When the court approves the final distribution of a cooperative’s assets, it shall enter a decree in the nature of articles of dissolution which shall be filed in the secretary of state’s office.

The filing of an action under this section operates as a stay of all other proceedings against the cooperative until such time as the court issues its final judgment or directs otherwise.

The court upon proper cause shown may at any time order the proceedings dismissed upon such terms and conditions as the court may impose.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1547; S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 14.

10-15-48.
Property omitted from final distribution.

Upon filing the articles or decree of dissolution, title to any property omitted from the final distribution vests in the surviving directors or committee members who signed the articles, as trustees. They have all the powers of the cooperative with respect to such property and shall distribute the property or its proceeds to the persons beneficially entitled thereto.

When no trustee can be found, the district court of the county where the property is located has power to appoint trustees upon application of any person having an interest in such property or its disposition.

Any trustee may at any time make application to the proper district court for supervision of liquidation pursuant to section 10-15-47.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1548; S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 15.

10-15-49.
Amounts due unknown persons.

Upon liquidation of a cooperative, the assets distributable to persons who are unknown or cannot be found may be reduced to cash and transferred to the commissioner of university and school lands and shall be treated as abandoned and unclaimed property under the escheat and abandoned property laws of the state.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1549; S.L. 1977, ch. 75, § 3.

Cross-References.

Abandoned and unclaimed property, see N.D.C.C. ch. 47-30.1.

10-15-50.
Survival of remedy after dissolution.

Except as provided in section 10-15-47, the dissolution of a cooperative does not impair any remedy available to or against such cooperative, its directors, stockholders, or members for any claim existing or any liability incurred prior to such dissolution if a proceeding thereon is commenced within two years after the date of filing the articles or decree of dissolution.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1550; S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 16.

10-15-51.
Admission of foreign cooperatives.

A foreign cooperative is authorized to do business in this state when the secretary of state issues a certificate of authority. In order to procure such certificate, the foreign cooperative shall make application therefor to the secretary of state and file with a certificate of good standing or certificate of existence duly authenticated by the incorporating officer of the state or country of incorporation. The application must set forth:

The name of the cooperative and the state or country under the laws of which it is incorporated.

The date of incorporation and the period of duration of the corporation.

The address of the principal office of the cooperative.

As provided in chapter 10-01.1, the name of the registered agent, and if a noncommercial registered agent, the address of the noncommercial registered agent in this state.

The purpose or purposes of the cooperative which it proposes to pursue in the transaction of business in this state.

The names and respective addresses of the directors and officers of the cooperative.

Such additional information as may be necessary or appropriate in order to enable the secretary of state to determine whether such cooperative is entitled to a certificate of authority to transact business in this state.

Such application must be made on forms prescribed by the secretary of state and must be executed by an officer of the cooperative.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1551; S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 17; 1983, ch. 135, § 1; 1993, ch. 88, § 6; 2007, ch. 99, § 8.

10-15-51.1.
Foreign cooperative — Name.

A foreign cooperative may apply for a certificate of authority under any name that would be available to a domestic cooperative, whether the name is the name under which it is authorized in its jurisdiction of origin. A trade name must be registered as provided in chapter 47-25 when applying for a certificate of authority under a name different from the name authorized in the jurisdiction of origin.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 87, § 4.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2011.

10-15-52.
Foreign cooperative authority.

Upon issuance of the secretary of state’s certificate of authority, a foreign cooperative is entitled to all rights, exemptions, and privileges of a cooperative organized for the same purposes under the laws of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1552.

10-15-52.1.
Merger of foreign cooperative authorized to transact business in this state.

Whenever a foreign cooperative authorized to transact business in this state is a party to a statutory merger permitted by the laws of the state or country under the laws of which it is associated, and such cooperative is not the surviving cooperative, within thirty days after such merger becomes effective, the surviving cooperative shall file with the secretary of state a certificate of fact of merger duly authenticated by the proper officer of the state or country under the laws of which such statutory merger was effected.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 18; 1993, ch. 88, § 7.

10-15-52.2.
Amendment to articles of association of foreign cooperatives. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 88, § 10.

10-15-52.3.
Amended certificate of authority.

A foreign cooperative authorized to transact business in this state must procure an amended certificate of authority if it changes its cooperative name or desires to pursue in this state purposes other than those set forth in its prior application for a certificate of authority by making application to the secretary of state.

The requirements in respect to the application and the issuance of an amended certificate of authority and the effect thereof are the same as an original application for a certificate of authority.

In addition, an application must be accompanied by a certificate of fact of amendment duly authenticated by the proper officer of the state or country where the cooperative is incorporated.

A foreign cooperative which amends its name and applies for an amended certificate of authority, and is the owner of a service mark, trademark, or trade name, is a general partner named in a fictitious name certificate, or is a general partner in a limited partnership which is on file with the secretary of state, must change or amend its name in each registration when it files an application for an amended certificate of authority.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 20; 1991, ch. 98, § 3; 1993, ch. 88, § 8; 2009, ch. 106, § 5.

10-15-52.4.
Withdrawal of foreign cooperative.

A foreign cooperative authorized to transact business in this state may withdraw from this state upon procuring from the secretary of state a certificate of withdrawal. In order to procure such certificate of withdrawal, such foreign cooperative shall deliver to the secretary of state an application for withdrawal, which shall set forth:

The name of the cooperative and the state or country under the laws of which it is associated.

That the cooperative is not transacting business in this state.

That the cooperative surrenders its authority to transact business in this state.

That service of process in any action, suit, or proceeding based upon any claim for relief arising in this state during the time the cooperative was authorized to transact business in this state may thereafter be made on such cooperative by service as provided in section 10-01.1-13.

A post-office address to which the secretary of state may mail a copy of any process against the cooperative that may be served on the secretary of state.

Such additional information as may be necessary or appropriate in order to enable the secretary of state to determine and assess any unpaid fees payable by such foreign cooperative.

The application for withdrawal shall be made on forms prescribed and furnished by the secretary of state and shall be executed by the cooperative by its president or vice president and by its secretary or an assistant secretary or, if the cooperative is in the hands of a receiver or trustee, shall be executed on behalf of the cooperative by such receiver or trustee.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 21; 1983, ch. 135, § 2; 1985, ch. 82, § 13; 2007, ch. 99, § 9.

10-15-52.5.
Filing of application for withdrawal for foreign cooperatives.

An application by a foreign cooperative for withdrawal must be delivered to the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the application conforms to the provisions of section 10-15-52.4 and that all fees have been paid, the secretary of state shall endorse on the original application the word “filed”, and the month, day, and year of the filing and issue a certificate of withdrawal to the cooperative or its representative. Upon the issuance of the certificate of withdrawal, the authority of the cooperative to transact business in this state ceases.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 22; 1991, ch. 98, § 4.

10-15-52.6.
Change of registered office or registered agent of foreign cooperative.

As provided in section 10-01.1-11:

A foreign cooperative authorized to transact business in this state may change its registered office, its registered agent, or both; and

A registered agent of a foreign cooperative may resign.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 88, § 9; 2007, ch. 99, § 10.

10-15-52.7.
Foreign cooperative — Revocation of certificate of authority.

The certificate of authority of a foreign cooperative to transact business in this state may be revoked by the secretary of state if:

The foreign cooperative has failed to:

Appoint and maintain a registered agent, and if a noncommercial registered agent, then the registered office of the noncommercial registered agent as provided in chapter 10-01.1;

File in the office of the secretary of state any amendment to its application for a certificate of authority as provided in section 10-15-52.3;

File in the office of the secretary of state any merger as provided in section 10-15-52.1;

File in the office of the secretary of state an application for a certificate of withdrawal of its authority as provided in section 10-15-52.5 when the cooperative’s existence has expired or the cooperative has been dissolved in the jurisdiction of origin; or

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other record submitted by the foreign cooperative pursuant to this chapter.

Except for revocation of the certificate of authority for failure to file the annual report as provided in section 10-15-53.2, no certificate of authority of a foreign cooperative may be revoked by the secretary of state unless:

The secretary of state has given the foreign cooperative at least sixty days’ notice by mail addressed to its registered agent at the registered office in this state or, if the foreign cooperative fails to appoint and maintain a registered agent in this state, then addressed to its principal executive office; and

During the sixty-day period, the foreign cooperative has failed to:

File the report of change as provided in chapter 10-01.1 regarding the registered office or the registered agent;

File any amendment;

File any merger;

File an application for certificate of withdrawal; or

Correct the misrepresentation.

Upon the expiration of sixty days after the mailing of the notice, the authority of the foreign cooperative to transact business in this state ceases and the secretary of state shall issue a notice of revocation and shall mail the notice to the registered agent at the registered office in this state or, if the foreign cooperative failed to appoint and maintain a registered agent or a registered office in this state, then addressed to the principal executive office of the foreign cooperative.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 87, § 5; 2015, ch. 86, § 4, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2011.

10-15-53.
Secretary of state — Filing documents — Effective date.

A record authorized or required to be filed with the secretary of state under this chapter must be captioned to describe the purpose of the record, be in a medium permitted by the secretary of state, and be delivered to the secretary of state. If the filing fees required by section 10-15-54 have been paid, then, unless the secretary of state determines that a record does not comply with the filing requirements of this chapter, the secretary of state shall file the record, and for all records, except annual reports, send an image of the filed record to the person who filed the record.

Upon request and payment of the fee provided in section 10-15-54, the secretary of state shall send to the requester a certified copy of a requested record.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a record filed with the secretary of state under this chapter may specify a delayed effective date that is no later than ninety days from the date of filing. If the record does not specify a delayed effective date, a record filed with the secretary of state is effective on the date the record is filed as evidenced by the endorsement of the secretary of state of the date on the record.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1553; S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 23; 1975, ch. 106, § 71; 1991, ch. 98, § 5; 2015, ch. 86, § 5, effective July 1, 2015.

10-15-53.1.
Secretary of state — Annual report to the secretary of state.

A cooperative and a foreign cooperative shall file an annual report signed by a principal officer or the general manager setting forth:

Its name and complete address of its principal place of business.

The names and addresses of its directors and principal officers.

In the case of a domestic cooperative, a statement, by class and par value, of the amount of stock it has authority to issue and the amount issued.

A statement as to the general type of business in which engaged during the prior year.

The annual report must be made on forms prescribed by the secretary of state and the information contained in the report must be given as of the date of the execution of the report. If the cooperative or foreign cooperative is in the hands of a receiver or trustee, the annual report must be signed on behalf of the cooperative or foreign cooperative by the receiver or trustee.

The secretary of state may destroy any annual report provided for in this section after the annual report is on file for six years.

Except for the first annual report, the annual report of a cooperative or foreign cooperative must be delivered to the secretary of state with the fees provided in section 10-15-54 before April first of each year. The first annual report of a cooperative must be delivered before April first in the year following the calendar year of the effective date stated in the articles of association, and the first annual report of a foreign cooperative must be delivered before April first of the year following the calendar year in which the certificate of authority was issued by the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall file the report if the report conforms to the requirements of subsections 1 and 2.

If the report does not conform to those requirements, the report must be returned to the cooperative or foreign cooperative for any necessary corrections.

If the report is filed before the deadlines provided in this section, any penalty for the failure to file a report within the time provided does not apply if the report is corrected to conform to the requirements of subsections 1 and 2 and returned to the secretary of state within thirty days after the annual report was returned by the secretary of state for corrections.

After May first, the secretary of state shall notify any cooperative or foreign cooperative failing to file its annual report that its certificate of incorporation or certificate of authority is not in good standing and may be dissolved or revoked as provided in section 10-15-53.2.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 86, § 6, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 92, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 85, § 10, effective August 1, 2021.